src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
höyhen:höyhe n_22_m ;
neppain:nepp2ai n_22_m ;
kuolain:kuolai n_22_m ;
vaarain:vaarai n_22_m ;
sierain:sierai n_22_m ;
auvain:auvai n_22_m ;
avvain:avvai n_22_m ;
kuuđain:kuuđai n_22_m ;
halkkein:halkk2ei n_22_m ;
aukkein:aukk2ei n_22_m ; ! XXX ?
esivanhin:esi#vanhi n_22_m ;
vanhin:vanhi n_22_m ;
vanhimet:vanhi n_22_m_pl ;
maaterivanhiimet:maateri#vanhii n_22_m_pl ;
materivanhiin:materi#vanhii n_22_m ;
materivanhiimet:materi#vanhii n_22_m_pl ;
esivanhiin:esi#vanhii n_22_m ;
ristivanhiimet:risti#vanhii n_22_m_pl ;
isovanhiin:iso#vanhii n_22_m ;
isovanhiimet:iso#vanhii n_22_m_pl ;
vanhiin:vanhii n_22_m ; 
vanhiimet:vanhii n_22_m_pl ;
morssiin:morssii n_22_m ;
morssiin+Err/Orth:morsia n_22_m ; 
poljin:polki n_22_m ;
vaađin:vaati n_22_m ;
hohđin:hohti n_22_m ;
hođin:hoti n_22_m ;
uistin:uisti n_22_m ;
luistin:luisti n_22_m ;
yđin:yti n_22_m ; ! ydin, (ydin with th)
istuin:istui n_22_m ;
kytkyin:kytkyi n_22_m ;
kotielläin:koti#elläi n_22_m ;
petoelläin:peto#elläi n_22_m ;
siitoselläin:siitos#elläi n_22_m ;
elläin:elläi n_22_m ;
pistäin:pistäi n_22_m ;
kevväin:kevväi n_22_m ;
sammal:sammal n_22 ;
taival:taipal n_22 ;
askel:askel n_22 ;
affen:affen n_22 ;
ien:iken n_22 ;
siemen:siemen n_22 ;
paimen:paimen n_22 ;
vuosikymmen:vuosi#kymmen n_22 ;
kämmen:kämmen n_22 ;
ruumen:ruumen n_22 ;
jäsen:jäsen n_22 ;
järviahven:järvi#ahven n_22 ;
ahven:ahven n_22 ;
meriahven:meriahven n_22 ;
isosisar:iso#sisar n_22 ;
pikkusisar:pikku#sisar n_22 ;
sisar:sisar n_22 ;
kuningatar:kuningattar n_22 ;
vanhaatytär:vanhaa#tyttär n_22 ;
jalkatytär:jalka#tyttär n_22 ;
krannitytär:kranni#tyttär n_22 ;
oppitytär:oppi#tyttär n_22 ;
ristitytär:risti#tyttär n_22 ;
pojantytär:pojan#tyttär n_22 ;
veljentytär:veljen#tyttär n_22 ;
sisarentytär:sisaren#tyttär n_22 ;
tyttärentytär:tyttären#tyttär n_22 ;
ruokkotytär:ruokko#tyttär n_22 ;
koulutytär:koulu#tyttär n_22 ;
tytär:tyttär n_22 ; !!= * @CODE@
rakkhaus+Err/Orth:rakhau n_22_s ; ! Rakhaus
rakkhaus:rakkhau n_22_s ;
rikkhaus:rikkhau n_22_s ;
laukhaus:laukhau n_22_s ;
vaphaus:vaphau n_22_s ;
sairhaus:sairhau n_22_s ;
rietthaus:rietthau n_22_s ;
varkkaus:varkkau n_22_s ;
hurskaus:hurskau n_22_s ;
seuraus:seurau n_22_s ;
viissaus:viissau n_22_s ;
puhtaus:puhtau n_22_s ;
harttaus:harttau n_22_s ;
kaunheus:kaunheu n_22_s ;
katheus:katheu n_22_s ;
rohkeus:rohkeu n_22_s ;
oikeus:oikeu n_22_s ;
mailmankaikkeus:mailman#kaikkeu n_22_s ;
vaikkeus:vaikkeu n_22_s ;
oikkeus:oikkeu n_22_s ;
korkkeus:korkkeu n_22_s ;
aukkeus:aukkeu n_22_s ;
ahneus:ahneu n_22_s ;
noppeus:noppeu n_22_s ;
lauppeus:lauppeu n_22_s ;
korreus:korreu n_22_s ;
kosteus:kosteu n_22_s ;
vanhus:vanhu n_22_s ;
pakanus:pakanu n_22_s ;
paljous:paljou n_22_s ;
laiđun:laitu n_22_m ;
pahuus:pahuu n_22_s ;
pahhuus:pahhuu n_22_s ;
vanhuus:vanhuu n_22_s ;
turhuus:turhuu n_22_s ;
laajuus:laajuu n_22_s ;
laiskuus:laiskuu n_22_s ;
kavaluus:kavaluu n_22_s ;
hulluus:hulluu n_22_s ;
onnettommuus:onnettommuu n_22_s ;
huonomuus:huonomuu n_22_s ;
jumalattomuus:jumalattomuu n_22_s ;
voimattomuus:voimattomuu n_22_s ;
onnettomuus:onnettomuu n_22_s ;
avuttomuus:avuttomuu n_22_s ;
levottomuus:levottomuu n_22_s ;
mahđottomuus:mahđottomuu n_22_s ;
varmuus:varmuu n_22_s ;
kuivuus:kuivuu n_22_s ;
pakanuus:pakanuu n_22_s ;
konnuus:konnuu n_22_s ;
mestaruus:mestaruu n_22_s ;
aika-avaruus:aika-#avaruu n_22_s ;
avaruus:avaruu n_22_s ;
nuoruus:nuoruu n_22_s ;
pirruus:pirruu n_22_s ;
suuruus:suuruu n_22_s ;
salhaisuus:salhaisuu n_22_s ;
salhaisuus+Err/Orth:salaisuu n_22_s ; 
kokonhaisuus:kokonhaisuu n_22_s ;
hiljaisuus:hiljaisuu n_22_s ;
mahtavuus:mahtavuu n_22_s ; !Aili: tarkista kaikkiin sannoin tavut tässä sanaroikassa
kaksirankaisuus:kaksi#rankaisuu n_22_s ;
rankaisuus:rankaisuu n_22_s ;
omaisuus:omaisuu n_22_s ;
ominaisuus:ominaisuu n_22_s ;
monikertaisuus:moni#kertaisuu n_22_s ;
moninkertaisuus:monin#kertaisuu n_22_s ; ! XXX check
tulleevaisuus:tulleevaisuu n_22_s ;
tulevaisuus:tulevaisuu n_22_s ;
loogisuus:loogisuu n_22_s ;
turvalisuus:turvalisuu n_22_s ;
tođelisuus:tođelisuu n_22_s ;
uskolisuus:uskolisuu n_22_s ;
kiitolisuus:kiitolisuu n_22_s ;
velvolisuus:velvolisuu n_22_s ;
elämismahđolisuus:elämis#mahđolisuu n_22_s ;
mahđolisuus:mahđolisuu n_22_s ;
umpisuus:umpisuu n_22_s ;
ikuisuus:ikuisuu n_22_s ;
omituisuus:omituisuu n_22_s ;
paksuus:paksuu n_22_s ;
lapsuus:lapsuu n_22_s ;
pittuus:pittuu n_22_s ;
tottuus:tottuu n_22_s ;
auttuus:auttuu n_22_s ;
henkkaavuus:henkkaavuu n_22_s ;
vahvuus:vahvuu n_22_s ;
vaivus:vaivu n_22_s ;
erheys:erhey n_22_s ;
yhtheys:yhthey n_22_s ;
tervheys:tervhey n_22_s ;
pehmeys:pehmey n_22_s ;
pimmeys:pimmey n_22_s ;
levveys:levvey n_22_s ;
köyhyys:köyhyy n_22_s ;
tyhmyys:tyhmyy n_22_s ;
äänettömyys:äänettömyy n_22_s ;
työttömyys:työttömyy n_22_s ;
vääryys:vääryy n_22_s ;
menneisyys:menneisyy n_22_s ;
erimielisyys:eri#mielisyy n_22_s ;
kristilisyys:kristilisyy n_22_s ;
ihmisyys:ihmisyy n_22_s ;
ittenäisyys:ittenäisyy n_22_s ;
yksinäisyys:yksinäisyy n_22_s ;
ryöttyys:ryöttyy n_22_s ;
hyvvyys:hyvvyy n_22_s ;
syvvyys:syvvyy n_22_s ;
läpinäkyvyys:läpi#näkyvyy n_22_s ;
näkyvyys:näkyvyy n_22_s ;
ikävyys:ikävyy n_22_s ;
ystävyys:ystävyy n_22_s ;
syđän:syđä n_22_m ;
